Maryland, session 2026, HB1080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
3–309.
ON OR AFTER JULY 4, 2025, THE GOVERNOR MAY NOT NOMINATE A CENSUS
TRACT FOR DESIGNATION AS A QUALIFIED OPPORTUNITY ZONE UNDER § 1400Z–1
OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–204.
(a) To the extent excluded from federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are added to the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(M) THE ADDITION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES ANY
CAPITAL GAINS EXCLUDED UNDER § 1400Z–2 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE AS
A RESULT OF AMENDMENTS TO THAT SECTION BY § 70421 OF PUBLIC LAW 119–21.
10–305.
(a) To the extent excluded from federal taxable income, the amounts under this
section are added to the federal taxable income of a corporation to determine Maryland
modified income.
(d) The addition under subsection (a) of this section includes the additions
required for an individual under:
(1) § 10–204(b) of this title (Dividends and interest from another state or
local obligation);
(2) § 10–204(c)(2) of this title (Federal tax–exempt income);
(3) § 10–204(e) of this title (Oil percentage depletion allowance);

HOUSE BILL 1080 3
(4) § 10–204(i) of this title (Deduction for qualified production activities
income);
(5) § 10–204(j) of this title (Deduction for costs for security clearance
administrative expenses and construction and equipment costs incurred to construct or
renovate a sensitive compartmented information facility); [and]
(6) § 10–204(l) of this title (Deduction for donations to qualified permanent
endowment funds); AND
(7) § 10–204(M) OF THIS TITLE (CAPITAL GAINS EXCLUDED FOR
INVESTMENT IN OPPORTUNITY ZONES).
(E) THE ADDITION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES ANY
AMOUNT OF FOREIGN–DERIVED DEDUCTION ELIGIBLE INCOME ALLOWED AS A
DEDUCTION UNDER § 250 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(F) THE ADDITION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES ANY
AMOUNT OF INTEREST EXCLUDED UNDER § 139L OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and Section 2 of this Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2025.